Utah statutes.
63H-2-302.   Approval of qualifying transmission project.
(1)  To approve a qualifying transmission project, the board shall determine
that the transmission project:
(a)  contributes to the economy of the state and the one or more communities
where the transmission project is located;
(b)  is strategically situated to maximize connections to a renewable energy
source project located in the state that is:
(i)  existing;
(ii)  under construction;
(iii)  planned; or
(iv)  foreseeable;
(c)  is supported by a business case for providing the revenue necessary to:
(i)  service an authority bond issued to finance the transmission project; and
(ii)  finance the construction and operation of a transmission project;
(d)  is supported by a transmission project plan related to:
(i)  engineering;
(ii)  environmental issues;
(iii)  energy production;
(iv)  load capacity; and
(v)  any other issue related to the building and operation of a transmission
line; and
(e)  complies with the regulations of the following regarding the building of
a transmission line or connection:
(i)  the Federal Energy Regulatory Commission;
(ii)  the North American Electric Reliability Council; and
(iii)  the Public Service Commission of Utah.
(2)  This chapter may not be used to compel interconnection to or use of a
transmission or interconnection line or facility that belongs to another
person.
